Utah statutes.
70C-6-304.   Cancellation by creditor.
A creditor may not request cancellation of a policy of property or liability
insurance except after the debtor's default or in accordance with a written
authorization by the debtor, and in either case the cancellation does not take
effect until written notice is delivered to the debtor or mailed to him at his
address as stated by him.  The notice shall state that the policy may be
cancelled on a date not less than 10 days after the notice is delivered, or,
if the notice is mailed, not less than 13 days after it is mailed.
